Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 748, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 20, O.S.L. 2022 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 748), is amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 12388 Page 1

Section 748. A. As used in Sections 748 and 748.2 of this
title:
1. "Coercion" means compelling, forcing or intimidating a
person to act by:
a. threats of harm or physical restraint against any
person,
b. any act, scheme, plan, or pattern intended to cause a
person to believe that performing, or failing to
perform, an act would result in serious physical,
financial, or emotional harm or distress to or
physical restraint against any person,
c. the abuse or threatened abuse of the law or legal
process,
d. knowingly destroying, concealing, removing,
confiscating or possessing any actual or purported
passport, labor or immigration document, or other
government identification document, including but not
limited to a driver license or birth certificate, of
another person,
e. facilitating or controlling a person's access to any
addictive or controlled substance other than for legal
medical purposes,
f. blackmail,

Req. No. 12388 Page 2

g. demanding or claiming money, goods, or any other thing
of value from or on behalf of a prostituted person
where such demand or claim arises from or is directly
related to the act of prostitution,
h. determining, dictating or setting the times at which
another person will be available to engage in an act
of prostitution with a third party,
i. determining, dictating or setting the places at which
another person will be available for solicitation of,
or to engage in, an act of prostitution with a third
party, or
j. determining, dictating or setting the places at which
another person will reside for purposes of making such
person available to engage in an act of prostitution
with a third party;
2. "Commercial sex" means any form of commercial sexual
activity such as sexually explicit performances, prostitution,
participation in the production of pornography, performance in a
strip club, or exotic dancing or display;
3. "Debt bondage" means the status or condition of a debtor
arising from a pledge by the debtor of his or her personal services
or of those of a person under his or her control as a security for
debt if the value of those services as reasonably assessed is not

Req. No. 12388 Page 3

appl ied toward the liquidation of the debt or the length and nature
of those services are not respectively limited and defined;
4. "Human trafficking" means modern-day slavery that includes,
but is not limited to, extreme exploitation and the denial of
freedom or liberty of an individual for purposes of deriving benefit
from that individual's commercial sex act or labor;
5. "Human trafficking for labor" means:
a. recruiting, enticing, harboring, maintaining,
transporting, providing or obtaining, by any means,
another person through deception, force, fraud, threat
or coercion or for purposes of engaging the person in
labor, or
b. benefiting, financially or by receiving anything of
value, from participation in a venture that has
engaged in an act of trafficking for labor;
6. "Human trafficking for commercial sex" means:
a. recruiting, enticing, harboring, maintaining,
transporting, providing or obtaining, by any means,
another person through deception, force, fraud, threat
or coercion for purposes of engaging the person in a
commercial sex act,
b. recruiting, enticing, harboring, maintaining,
transporting, providing, purchasing or obtaining, by

Req. No. 12388 Page 4

any means, a minor for purposes of engaging the minor
in a commercial sex act, or
c. benefiting, financially or by receiving anything of
value, from participating in a venture that has
engaged in an act of trafficking for commercial sex;
7. "Legal process" means the criminal law, the civil law, or
the regulatory system of the federal government, any state,
territory, district, commonwealth, or trust territory therein, and
any foreign government or subdivision thereof and includes legal
civil actions, criminal actions, and regulatory petitions or
applications;
8. "Minor" means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age; and
9. "Victim" means a person against whom a violation of any
provision of this section has been committed.
B. It shall be unlawful to knowingly engage in human
trafficking.
C. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in
the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less
than five (5) years or for life, or by a fine of not more than One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment. Any person violating the provisions of this section
where the victim of the offense is under eighteen (18) years of age
Req. No. 12388 Page 5

at t he time of the offense shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department
of Corrections for a term of not less than fifteen (15) years or for
life, or by a fine of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($250,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment. The
court shall also order the defendant to pay restitution to the
victim as provided in Section 991f of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. If the person is convicted of human trafficking, the
person shall serve eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence before
being eligible for parole consideration or any earned credits. The
terms of imprisonment specified in this subsection shall not be
subject to statutory provisions for suspension, deferral or
probation, or state correctional institution earned credits accruing
from and after November 1, 1989, except for the achievement earned
credits authorized by subsection H of Section 138 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. To qualify for such achievement earned credits,
such inmates must also be in compliance with the standards for Class
level 2 behavior, as defined in subsection D of Section 138 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. 1. A "No Trafficking" zone of safety is hereby created
around public or private elementary, secondary, or post-secondary
schools. A person is prohibited from conducting any human
trafficking-related activities within one thousand (1,000) feet of

Req. No. 12388 Page 6

any public or private elementary, secondary, or post-secondary
school.
2. Any person convicted of human trafficking within a "No
Trafficking" zone of safety, as provided in paragraph 1 of this
subsection, shall receive a ten-year penalty enhancement as an
addition to the sentence provided for in subsection C of this
section.
E. It is an affirmative defense to prosecution for a criminal,
youthful offender, or delinquent offense that, during the time of
the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant or alleged
youthful offender or delinquent was a victim of human trafficking.
E. F. The consent of a victim to the activity prohibited by
this section shall not constitute a defense.
F. G. Lack of knowledge of the age of the victim shall not
constitute a defense to the activity prohibited by this section with
respect to human trafficking of a minor.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 748.1 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Beginning November 1, 2025, warning signs of the penalties for
the trafficking of persons under Section 748 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall be posted at the following businesses:
1. Cosmetology establishments, as defined in Section 199.1 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
Req. No. 12388 Page 7

2. Establishments or schools that provide massage therapy or
instruction in massage therapy, as defined in Section 4200.2 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Establishments that provide body piercing or tattooing
services, as defined in Section 842.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
4. Hospitals, as defined in Section 1-701 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
The signage shall be posted in a conspicuous place that is
either near the public entrance of the business establishment or
near the location where similar notices are customarily posted at
the business establishment.
B. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs
Control shall adopt rules regarding the placement, installation,
design, size, wording, and maintenance procedures for the warning
signs required under this section. The rules shall require that
each warning sign:
1. Include a description of the provisions of Section 748 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes including the criminal penalties
for violating the statute;
2. Be written in English and Spanish; and
3. Be at least eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8
1/2 x 11) in size.

Req. No. 12388 Page 8

C. The Bureau shall provide a warning sign without charge to
each business establishment listed in subsection A of this section.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-100.11 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Beginning November 1, 2025, public schools of this state shall
post warning signs of the penalties for the trafficking of persons
under Section 748 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes at the
following locations:
1. Parallel to and along the exterior boundaries of the
premises of the school;
2. At each roadway or other way of access to the premises of
the school;
3. For premises not fenced, at least every five hundred (500)
feet along the exterior boundaries of the premises of the school;
4. At each entrance to the premises of the school; and
5. At conspicuous places reasonably likely to be viewed by all
persons entering the premises of the school.
B. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs
Control shall adopt rules regarding the placement, installation,
design, size, wording, and maintenance procedures for the warning
signs required under this section. The rules shall require that
each warning sign:

Req. No. 12388 Page 9

1. Include a description of the provisions of Section 748 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes including the criminal penalties
for violating the statute;
2. Be written in English and Spanish; and
3. Be at least eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8
1/2 x 11) in size.
C. The Bureau shall provide each school without charge the
number of warning signs required to comply with the provisions of
this section.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 19-115.1 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Service Oklahoma in collaboration with the State Department
of Education shall require that information relating to human
trafficking prevention be included in the curriculum of any driver
education course.
B. Service Oklahoma and the State Department of Education shall
consult with the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous
Drugs Control when developing materials and training guidelines for
driver education instructors.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12388 GRS 02/05/25

Req. No. 12388 Page 10